Georgia, session 2025_26, HB143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
6 SECTION 1.
7 Chapter 5 of Title 12 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to water resources,
8 is amended by revising paragraph (3) of subsection (b) and subsection (m.1) of Code
9 Section 12-5-31, relating to regulated riparian rights to surface waters for general or farm
10 use, permits for withdrawal, diversion, or impoundment, coordination with water plans,
11 metering of farm use, interbasin transfers, and appeal procedures, as follows:
12 "(3)(A) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section to the contrary, a
13 permit for the withdrawal or diversion of surface waters for farm uses shall be issued
14 by the director to any person when the applicant submits an application which provides
15 reasonable proof that the applicant's farm use of surface waters occurred prior to
16 July 1, 1988, and when any such application is submitted prior to July 1, 1991. If
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 1 -

25 LC 44 3002S
17 submitted prior to July 1, 1991, an application for a permit to be issued based upon
18 farm uses of surface waters occurring prior to July 1, 1988, shall be granted for the
19 withdrawal or diversion of surface waters at a rate of withdrawal or diversion equal to
20 the greater of the operating capacity in place for withdrawal or diversion on
21 July 1, 1988, or, when measured in gallons per day on a monthly average for a calendar
22 year, the greatest withdrawal or diversion capacity during the five-year period
23 immediately preceding July 1, 1988. If submitted after July 1, 1991, or, regardless of
24 when submitted, if it is based upon a withdrawal or diversion of surface waters for farm
25 uses occurring or proposed to occur on or after July 1, 1988, an application shall be
26 subject to evaluation and classification pursuant to subsections (e), (f), and (g) of this
27 Code section, but a permit based upon such evaluation and classification shall be issued
28 to ensure the applicant's right to a reasonable use of such surface waters. Any permit
29 issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be conditioned upon the requirement that the
30 permittee shall provide, on forms prescribed by the director, information relating to a
31 general description of the lands and number of acres subject to irrigation and the
32 permit; a description of the general type of irrigation system used; the source of
33 withdrawal water such as river, stream, or impoundment; and pump information,
34 including rated capacity, pump location, and power information.
35 (B) Permits applied for under this paragraph on or after April 20, 2006, for farm use
36 in the Flint River basin shall have a term of 25 years and shall be automatically
37 renewed at the original permitted capacity unless an evaluation by the division indicates
38 that renewal at the original capacity would have unreasonable adverse effects upon
39 other water uses. The division may renew the original permit at a lower capacity, but
40 such capacity shall be based on the reasonable use of the permittee and evaluation of
41 the resource.
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 2 -

25 LC 44 3002S
42 (C) A permittee may apply to have a permit issued under this paragraph modified,
43 amended, transferred, or assigned to subsequent owners of the lands which are the
44 subject of such permit; provided, however, that:
45 (i) The division shall receive written notice of any such transfer or assignment;
46 (ii) Any modification in or amendment to the use or capacity conditions contained
47 in the permit or in the lands which are the subject of such permit shall require the
48 permittee to submit an application for review and approval by the director consistent
49 with this Code section; and
50 (iii) The permittee may commence withdrawing water under the modified, amended,
51 transferred, or assigned permit on the effective date stated on the revised permit for
52 farm use; and
53 (iv) For all permits for which such modification, amendment, transfer, or assignment
54 is effective on or after April 20, 2018, and for which no water-measuring device is
55 installed, the permittee shall have one year from the updated effective date stated on
56 the revised permit for farm use to have an acceptable type of water-measuring device
57 installed, to have such device in operation at each point of permitted withdrawal, and
58 to notify the division in writing once the installation has occurred. The division shall
59 approve or disapprove the installation within 60 days of the date of notification. The
60 permittee shall be responsible for all associated costs.
61 (D) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as a repeal or modification of Code
62 Section 12-5-46."
63 "(m.1)(1) The division shall have the duty of implementing a program of measuring farm
64 uses of water in order to obtain clear and accurate information on the patterns and
65 amounts of such use, which information is essential to proper management of water
66 resources by the state and useful to farmers for improving the efficiency and effectiveness
67 of their use of water, meeting the requirements of subsections (b) and (m) of this Code
68 section, and improving water conservation.
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 3 -

25 LC 44 3002S
69 (2) The division:
70 (A) May conduct its duties with division staff and may contract with other persons to
71 conduct any of its duties;
72 (B) May receive and use state appropriations, gifts, grants, or other sources of funding
73 to carry out its duties;
74 (C) Shall develop a priority system for the installation of devices for measurement of
75 farm uses of water at the points of those withdrawals for which a permit was issued as
76 of July 1, 2003. The division may refine the priority system from time to time based
77 on the amount of funding received by the division, considerations regarding cost
78 effectiveness, new technical information, changes in resource use or conditions, or
79 other factors as deemed relevant by the director;
80 (D) Shall, on behalf of the state, contract for the purchase and installation of that subset
81 of water-measuring devices according to the priority system required by this Code
82 section, and no charge shall be made to the permittee for such costs. However, when
83 the division assesses the site or attempts to install such water-measuring devices and
84 finds that the site lacks withdrawal or irrigation infrastructure, the division shall
85 document such withdrawal or irrigation infrastructure conditions and notify the
86 permittee in writing that a state funded water-measuring device or devices could not be
87 installed and that a device or devices are still required. After the expiration of five
88 years, such permittee shall be responsible for having an acceptable type of
89 water-measuring device installed and placed into operation and all associated costs.
90 The permittee shall notify the division in writing once the installation has occurred.
91 The division shall approve or disapprove the installation within 60 days of the date of
92 notification If no contractor is available, the division may use trained and certified staff
93 to perform installations, and no charge shall be made to the permittee for such costs;
94 (E) Shall, at monthly intervals, read an appropriate proportion of water-measuring
95 devices installed for measuring farm use of surface water and compile the collected data
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 4 -

25 LC 44 3002S
96 for use in meeting the purposes in paragraph (1) of this subsection, and the division
97 shall communicate in advance with private property owners to establish reasonable
98 times for such readings. In the event that a permittee's water-measuring devices are
99 selected for monthly readings, the permittee may choose to perform those readings and
100 transmit that information to the division; and
101 (F) Shall issue an annual progress report on the status of water-measuring device
102 installation.
103 (3) Any person whose permit for agricultural water use was issued before July 1, 2003,
104 and who desires to install a water-measuring device at no cost to the state may do so,
105 provided that the permittee shall have an acceptable type of water-measuring device
106 installed and placed in operation at each point of permitted withdrawal and the permittee
107 shall notify the division in writing once the installation has occurred. The division shall
108 approve or disapprove the installation within 60 days of the date of notification.
109 (4) Any person who desires to commence a farm use of water for which a permit is
110 issued after July 1, 2003, shall not commence such use prior to receiving approval from
111 the division that such person has installed an acceptable type of water-measuring device
112 installed by the commission at each point of permitted withdrawal. The permittee shall
113 be responsible for all such costs.
114 (5) Employees, contractors, or agents of the division are authorized to enter upon private
115 property at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice to conduct the duties of the
116 division under this subsection.
117 (6) Regarding all permits for which a water-measuring device is installed, regardless of
118 when the permit was issued, the division shall contract for the annual reading of such
119 water-measuring devices. The division shall require each contractor conducting such
120 annual readings to transmit complete and accurate data required by the division to the
121 division annually.
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 5 -

25 LC 44 3002S
122 (7) The division shall audit a subset of reported water-measuring device readings
123 submitted by permittees for the purpose of understanding and improving the accuracy of
124 such readings.
125 (8) The division shall contract for any maintenance, repair, or replacement of
126 water-measuring devices installed pursuant to this Code section where maintenance,
127 repair, or replacement is required to ensure that such water-measuring devices accurately
128 reflect the amount of water used, and no charge shall be made to the permittee for such
129 costs. The division shall also have the authority to undertake repairs or replacements of
130 water-measuring devices when such repairs or replacements are necessary to maintain
131 compliance with water use regulations, and no charge shall be made to the permittee for
132 such costs.
133 (9) If the division determines that the permittee or the permittee's employees, tenants,
134 licensees, or agents have willfully dismantled, sold, relocated, or removed any
135 water-measuring device installed pursuant to this Code section, the permittee may be
136 subject to enforcement action by the division, including but not limited to imposition of
137 civil penalties.
138 (10) Any reports of amounts of use for recreational purposes under this Code section
139 shall be compiled separately from amounts reported for all other farm uses."
140 SECTION 2.
141 Said chapter is further amended by revising subsections (b) and (b.1) of Code
142 Section 12-5-105, relating to regulated reasonable use of ground water for farm use, permits
143 to withdraw, obtain, or utilize, metering, and related procedures, as follows:
144 "(b) Notwithstanding any provisions of Code Section 12-5-95, 12-5-96, or 12-5-97 to the
145 contrary, permits to withdraw, obtain, or utilize ground waters for farm uses, as that term
146 is defined in paragraph (5.1) of Code Section 12-5-92, whether for new withdrawals or
147 under subsection (a) of this Code section, shall be governed as follows:
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 6 -

25 LC 44 3002S
148 (1) Permits applied for under this Code section on or after April 20, 2006, for farm use
149 within the Flint River basin shall have a term of 25 years and shall be automatically
150 renewed at the original permitted capacity unless an evaluation by the division indicates
151 that renewal at the original capacity would have unreasonable adverse effects upon other
152 water uses. The division may renew the original permit at a lower capacity, but such
153 capacity shall be based on the reasonable use of the permittee and evaluation of the
154 resource;
155 (2) A permittee may apply to have a permit issued under this Code section modified,
156 amended, transferred, or assigned to subsequent owners of the lands which are the subject
157 of such permit; provided, however, that:
158 (A) The division shall receive written notice of any such transfer or assignment;
159 (B) Any modification in or amendment to the use or capacity conditions contained in
160 the permit or in the lands which are the subject of such permit shall require the
161 permittee to submit an application for review and approval by the director consistent
162 with the requirements of this part; and
163 (C) The permittee may commence withdrawing water under the modified, amended,
164 transferred, or assigned permit on the effective date stated on the revised permit for
165 farm use; and
166 (D) For all permits for which such modification, amendment, transfer, or assignment
167 is effective on or after April 20, 2018, and for which no water-measuring device is
168 installed, the permittee shall have one year from the updated effective date stated on the
169 revised permit for farm use to have an acceptable type of water-measuring device
170 installed, to have such device in operation at each point of permitted withdrawal, and
171 to notify the division in writing once the installation has occurred. The division shall
172 approve or disapprove the installation within 60 days of the date of notification. The
173 permittee shall be responsible for all associated costs;
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 7 -

25 LC 44 3002S
174 (3) Permits for farm use, after initial use has commenced, shall not be revoked, in whole
175 or in part, for nonuse; except that the director may permanently revoke any permit under
176 this Code section for farm use within the Flint River Basin applied for on or after
177 April 20, 2006, if initial use for the purpose indicated on the permit application, as
178 measured by a flow meter approved by the division has not commenced within two years
179 of the date of issuance of the permit unless the permittee can reasonably demonstrate that
180 his or her nonuse was due to financial hardship or circumstances beyond his or her
181 control;
182 (4) The director may suspend or modify a permit for farm use if he or she should
183 determine through inspection, investigations, or otherwise that the quantity of water
184 allowed would prevent other applicants from reasonable use of ground water beneath
185 their property for farm use;
186 (5) During emergency periods of water shortage, the director shall give first priority to
187 providing water for human consumption and second priority to farm use; and
188 (6) The importance and necessity of water for industrial purposes are in no way modified
189 or diminished by this Code section.
190 (b.1)(1) The division shall have the duty of implementing a program of measuring farm
191 uses of water in order to obtain clear and accurate information on the patterns and
192 amounts of such use, which information is essential to proper management of water
193 resources by the state and useful to farmers for improving the efficiency and effectiveness
194 of their use of water, meeting the requirements of subsections (b) and (b.1) of this Code
195 section, and improving water conservation.
196 (2) The division:
197 (A) May conduct its duties with division staff and may contract with other persons to
198 conduct any of its duties;
199 (B) May receive and use state appropriations, gifts, grants, or other sources of funding
200 to carry out its duties;
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 8 -

25 LC 44 3002S
201 (C) Shall develop a priority system for the installation of devices for measurement of
202 farm uses of water at the points of those withdrawals for which a permit was issued as
203 of July 1, 2003. The division may refine the priority system from time to time based
204 on the amount of funding received by the division, considerations regarding cost
205 effectiveness, new technical information, changes in resource use or conditions, or
206 other factors as deemed relevant by the director;
207 (D) Shall, on behalf of the state, contract for the purchase and installation of that subset
208 of water-measuring devices according to the priority system required by this Code
209 section, and no charge shall be made to the permittee for such costs. However, when
210 the division assesses the site or attempts to install such water-measuring devices and
211 finds that the site lacks the withdrawal or irrigation infrastructure, the division shall
212 document such withdrawal or irrigation infrastructure conditions and notify the
213 permittee in writing that a state funded water-measuring device or devices could not be
214 installed and that a device or devices are still required. After the expiration of five
215 years, such permittee shall be responsible for having an acceptable type of
216 water-measuring device installed and placed into operation and all associated costs.
217 The permittee shall notify the division in writing once the installation has occurred.
218 The division shall approve or disapprove the installation within 60 days of the date of
219 notification If no contractor is available, the division may use trained and certified staff
220 to perform installations, and no charge shall be made to the permittee for such costs;
221 (E) Shall, at monthly intervals, read an appropriate proportion of water-measuring
222 devices installed for measuring farm use of ground water and compile the collected data
223 for use in meeting the purposes in paragraph (1) of this Code section, and the division
224 shall communicate in advance with private property owners to establish reasonable
225 times for such readings. In the event that a permittee's water-measuring devices are
226 selected for monthly readings, the permittee may choose to perform those readings and
227 transmit that information to the division; and
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 9 -

25 LC 44 3002S
228 (F) Shall issue an annual progress report on the status of water-measuring device
229 installation.
230 (3) Any person whose permit for agricultural water use was issued before July 1, 2003,
231 and who desires to install a water-measuring device at no cost to the state may do so,
232 provided that the permittee shall have an acceptable type of water-measuring device
233 installed and placed in operation at each point of permitted withdrawal and the permittee
234 shall notify the division in writing once the installation has occurred. The division shall
235 approve or disapprove the installation within 60 days of the date of notification.
236 (4) Any person who desires to commence a farm use of water for which a permit is
237 issued after July 1, 2003, shall not commence such use prior to receiving approval from
238 the division that such person has installed an acceptable type of water-measuring device
239 installed by the commission at each point of permitted withdrawal. The permittee shall
240 be responsible for all such costs.
241 (5) Regarding all permits for which a water-measuring device is installed, regardless of
242 when the permit was issued, the division shall contract for the annual reading of such
243 water-measuring devices. The division shall require each contractor conducting such
244 annual readings to transmit complete and accurate data required by the division to the
245 division annually.
246 (6) The division shall audit a subset of reported water-measuring device readings
247 submitted by permittees for the purpose of understanding and improving the accuracy of
248 such readings.
249 (7) Employees, contractors, or agents of the division are authorized to enter upon private
250 property at reasonable times and upon reasonable notice to conduct the duties of the
251 division under this subsection.
252 (8) The division shall contract for any maintenance, repair, or replacement of
253 water-measuring devices installed pursuant to this Code section where maintenance,
254 repair, or replacement is required to ensure that such water-measuring devices accurately
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 10 -

25 LC 44 3002S
255 reflect the amount of water used, and no charge shall be made to the permittee for such
256 costs. The division shall also have the authority to undertake repairs or replacements of
257 water-measuring devices when such repairs or replacements are necessary to maintain
258 compliance with water use regulations, and no charge shall be made to the permittee for
259 such costs.
260 (9) If the division determines that the permittee or the permittee's employees, tenants,
261 licensees, or agents have willfully dismantled, sold, relocated, or removed any
262 water-measuring device installed pursuant to this Code section, the permittee may be
263 subject to enforcement action by the division, including but not limited to imposition of
264 civil penalties.
265 (10) Any reports of amounts of use for recreational purposes under this part shall be
266 compiled separately from amounts reported for all other farm uses.
267 (c) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as a repeal or modification of Code
268 Section 12-5-104."
269 SECTION 3.
270 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 143 (SUB)
- 11 -